Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1516.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-106, as
last amended by Section 5, Chapter 11, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 6-106), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-106. A. 1. Every application for a driver license
or identification card shall be made by the applicant upon a form
furnished by Service Oklahoma.
2. Every original, renewal, or replacement application for a
driver license or identification card made by a male applicant who
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1516 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

is a t least sixteen (16) but less than twenty-six (26) years of age
shall include a statement that by submitting the application, the
applicant is consenting to registration with the Selective Service
System. The pertinent information from the application shall be
forwarded by Service Oklahoma to the Data Management Center of the
Selective Service System in order to register the applicant as
required by law with the Selective Service System. Any applicant
refusing to sign the consent statement shall be denied a driver
license or identification card.
3. Except as provided for in subsections G and H of this
section, every applicant for a driver license or identification card
shall provide to Service Oklahoma at the time of application a
document showing proof of identity. Service Oklahoma shall
promulgate rules prescribing forms of identification acceptable for
an original Oklahoma driver license.
B. Every applicant for a driver license shall provide the
following information:
1. Full name;
2. Date of birth;
3. Sex;
4. Address of principal residence and county of such residence,
which shall be referenced on the REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card; and proof of such principal residency, as

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1516 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

pres cribed by rules promulgated by Service Oklahoma, documenting
provided address;
5. Current and complete mailing address to be maintained by
Service Oklahoma for the purpose of giving notice, if necessary, as
required by Section 2-116 of this title;
6. Medical information, as determined by the Department of
Public Safety, which shall assure Service Oklahoma that the person
is not prohibited from being licensed as provided by paragraph 7 of
subsection A of Section 6-103 of this title;
7. Whether the applicant is deaf or hard-of-hearing;
8. A brief description of the applicant, as determined by the
Department;
9. Whether the applicant has previously been licensed, and, if
so, when and by what state or country, and whether any license has
ever been suspended or revoked, or whether an application has ever
been refused, and, if so, the date of and reason for the suspension,
revocation, or refusal;
10. Whether the applicant is an alien eligible to be considered
for licensure and is not prohibited from licensure pursuant to
paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this title;
11. Whether the applicant has:
a. previously been licensed and, if so, when and by what
state or country, and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1516 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. held more than one license at the same time during the
immediately preceding ten (10) years; and
12. Social Security number.
No person shall request Service Oklahoma to use the Social Security
number of that person as the driver license number. Upon renewal or
replacement of any driver license issued after the effective date of
this act July 1, 2001, the licensee shall advise Service Oklahoma or
the licensed operator if the present driver license number of the
licensee is the Social Security number of the licensee. If the
driver license number is the Social Security number, Service
Oklahoma or the licensed operator shall change the driver license
number to a computer-generated alphanumeric identification.
C. 1. In addition to the requirements of subsections A and B
of this section, every applicant for a commercial driver license who
is subject to the requirements of 49 C.F.R., Part 391, and is
applying for an original, renewal, or replacement license, and every
person who, upon or after May 8, 2012, is currently the holder of a
commercial driver license and is subject to the requirements of 49
C.F.R., Part 391, and who does not apply for a renewal or
replacement license prior to January 30, 2014, shall submit to
Service Oklahoma and maintain with Service Oklahoma a current
approved medical examination certificate signed by a licensed
physician authorized to perform and approve medical examination
certifications. Service Oklahoma shall adopt rules for maintaining
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1516 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

medi cal examination certificates pursuant to the requirements in 49
C.F.R., Parts 383 and 384. Any commercial driver licensee subject
to the requirements of this paragraph who fails to maintain on file
with Service Oklahoma a current, approved medical examination
certificate shall have the driving privileges of the person
downgraded to a Class D driver license by Service Oklahoma.
2. If the applicant is applying for an original commercial
driver license in Oklahoma or is transferring a commercial driver
license from another state to Oklahoma, Service Oklahoma shall
review the driving record of the applicant in other states for the
immediately preceding ten (10) years, unless the record review has
already been performed by Service Oklahoma. As a result of the
review, if it is determined by Service Oklahoma that the applicant
is subject to a period of disqualification as prescribed by Section
6-205.2 of this title which has not yet been imposed, Service
Oklahoma shall impose the period of disqualification and the
applicant shall serve the period of disqualification before a
commercial driver license is issued to the applicant; provided,
nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to prevent the issuance
of a Class D driver license to the applicant.
3. If the applicant has or is applying for a hazardous material
endorsement, the applicant shall submit to a security threat
assessment performed by the Transportation Security Administration
of the Department of Homeland Security as required by and pursuant
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1516 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

to 4 9 C.F.R., Part 1572, which shall be used to determine whether
the applicant is eligible for the endorsement pursuant to federal
law and regulation.
4. Service Oklahoma shall notify each commercial driving school
of the passage of this section, and each commercial driving school
shall notify prospective students of its school of the hazardous
material endorsement requirement.
D. In addition to the requirements of subsections A and B of
this section, every applicant shall be given an option on the
application for issuance of a driver license or identification card
or renewal pursuant to Section 6-115 of this title to provide an
emergency contact person. The emergency contact information
requested may include full name, address, and phone number. The
emergency contact information shall be maintained by Service
Oklahoma and shall be used by Service Oklahoma and law enforcement
for emergency purposes only. A person listed as an emergency
contact may request to be removed at any time. Any update to a
change of name, address, or phone number may be made by the
applicant listing the emergency contact person or by the person
listed as the emergency contact.
E. Whenever application is received from a person previously
licensed in another jurisdiction, Service Oklahoma shall request a
copy of the driving record from the other jurisdiction and,
effective September 1, 2005, from all other jurisdictions in which
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1516 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the person was licensed within the immediately previous ten (10)
years. When received, the driving record shall become a part of the
driving record of the person in this state with the same force and
effect as though entered on the driver’s record in this state in the
original instance.
F. Whenever Service Oklahoma receives a request for a driving
record from another licensing jurisdiction, the record shall be
forwarded without charge.
G. A person shall not apply for or possess more than one state-
issued or territory-issued REAL ID Compliant Driver License or
Identification Card pursuant to the provisions of Section 6-101 of
this title. A valid and unexpired Oklahoma driver license shall
serve as both primary and secondary proofs of identity whenever
application for a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card is
submitted to Service Oklahoma. The provisions of subsection B of
Section 1550.42 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall not apply
when issuing an identification card pursuant to the provisions of
this subsection. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules necessary
to implement and administer the provisions of this subsection.
H. A valid and unexpired U.S. passport shall serve as both
primary and secondary proofs of identity whenever application for a
driver license or identification card is submitted to the
Department. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement and administer the provisions of this subsection.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1516 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

I. Service Oklahoma shall, to the extent practical, include on
any form issued under the provisions of this section an option for
an applicant to donate monies to the Oklahoma Department of Veterans
Affairs.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1112, as
amended by Section 124, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1112), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1112. A. Every owner of a vehicle possessing a
certificate of title shall, before using the same in this state,
make an application for the registration of such vehicle with a
licensed operator. The application shall contain such information
as shall be required by Service Oklahoma. Every owner, when making
application for registration, shall furnish the following
information:
1. A full description of the vehicle including the make, model,
color, manufacturer’s serial or other identification number, any
security interest upon the vehicle, an odometer reading of the
vehicle when applicable, and the insurance security verification to
the vehicle;
2. The correct name and address, the name of the city, county
and state in which the person in whose name the vehicle is to be
registered resides, the driver license number of the owner if the
owner has a driver license or the Federal Employers Identification
Number federal employer identification number of the owner if such
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1516 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

owne r is not an individual, and such other information as may be
prescribed by Service Oklahoma; and
3. a. The name of the carrier of the owner’s insurance
policy for such vehicle,
b. The policy number of the owner’s policy for such
vehicle, if available, or the name of the agent or
office where the existence of security may be
verified, if other than the carrier,
c. The effective dates of the owner’s policy for such
vehicle, and
d. A statement of the existence of a nonuse affidavit if
filed by the vehicle owner pursuant to the provisions
of Section 7-607 of this title.
B. Any owner or lessee of a noncommercial vehicle possessing a
certificate of title may, at the time of initial application for
registration or application for renewal, inform Service Oklahoma
that the owner, lessee or someone who may be operating the vehicle
is deaf, hard-of-hearing, autistic or suffers from Apraxia apraxia
or a communication disorder. That information, if provided, shall
be available to law enforcement through Service Oklahoma’s vehicle
registration system to assist law enforcement in identifying the
operator of the vehicle as possibly being deaf, hard-of-hearing,
autistic or suffering from Apraxia apraxia or a communication
disorder. As used in this section, “communication disorder” is
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1516 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

defi ned as impairment in the ability to receive, send, process and
comprehend concepts or verbal, nonverbal and graphic symbol systems.
C. In every case where a vehicle has been registered upon an
application containing any false statement of a fact required in
this section to be shown in an application for the registration
thereof, Service Oklahoma shall give written notice of at least five
(5) days to the owner of the vehicle, and shall require the owner to
appear before it for the purpose of showing cause why the
registration should not be canceled. Unless satisfactory
explanation is given by the owner concerning such false statement,
Service Oklahoma shall cancel the registration. The owner of the
vehicle shall then be required to immediately reregister the vehicle
and pay the required fees. The owner shall not be entitled to
refund or credit for the fees paid for registration of the motor
vehicle made under the application which contained any false
statement of fact.
D. Service Oklahoma shall insert in the application forms
appropriate notice to the applicant that any false statement of a
fact required to be shown in such application for registration
subjects the applicant to prosecution.
E. Service Oklahoma shall, to the extent practical, include on
any form issued under the provisions of this section an option for
an applicant to donate monies to the Oklahoma Department of Veterans
Affairs.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1516 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
February 9, 2026 - DO PASS






















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1516 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)